District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.19

Homeownership counseling.

A lender shall inform a borrower of his or her right to obtain counseling in connection with a covered loan. A Red Flag Warning Disclosure Notice shall satisfy this requirement.

History

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 219, 49 DCR 2551

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 219 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).